North Dakota, session 69, HB1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. TRANSFER OF LAND AUTHORIZED. The state of North Dakota, by and through the
department of health and human services, shall convey certain real property adjacent to the North
Dakota state hospital, Jamestown, North Dakota, consisting of approximately 25.2 acres
[10.2 hectares], more or less, within parcel 4, a tract of land located in the south half of the southeast
quarter of section 6, township 139 north, range 63 west of the fifth principal meridian, Stutsman County,
North Dakota, to the office of the adjutant general to construct a new training and storage facility.
Sections 54-01-05.2 and 54-01-05.5 do not apply to the transfer authorized by this section.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1520 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1520 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State